Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3886.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 10A.177, is amended to read: 10A.177 NONCOORDINATED EXPENDITURES. Any of the following actions, taken alone, do not establish that an expenditure made by the spender is coordinated with the candidate: (1) a candidate asks a spender not to make any expenditure to support the candidate or oppose the candidate's opponentnew text begin or any disbursement for an electioneering communication that references the candidate or the candidate's opponentnew text end ; (2) a candidate provides to a spender names of potential donors, as long as the spender does not state or suggest to the candidate that funds received from use of the donor list will be used for independent expenditures to benefit the candidate; (3) an expenditure uses a photograph, video, or audio recording obtained from a publicly available source or public event; (4) an expenditure uses information obtained from a biography, position paper, press release, or similar material about the candidate from a publicly available source or public event; (5) the spender contributes to the candidate, makes an in-kind donation to the candidate, or endorses the candidate; (6) an expenditure includes a hyperlink to the candidate's website or social media page; (7) an expenditure appears in a news story, commentary, or editorial distributed deleted text begin through the facilities of any broadcasting station, newspaper, magazine, or other periodical publication;deleted text end new text begin by any broadcasting station, including a cable or streaming television operator, programmer, or producer; website; newspaper; magazine; or other periodical publication, including any Internet or electronic publication. If the facility is owned or controlled by any political party, political committee, or candidate, the news story must:new text end new text begin (i) represent a bona fide news account communicated in a publication of general circulation or on a licensed broadcasting facility; and new text end new text begin (ii) be part of a general pattern of campaign-related news accounts that give reasonably equal coverage to all opposing candidates in the circulation or listening area; new text end (8) the spender discusses the candidate's position on a legislative or policy matter with the candidate. This clause includes the sending, completion, and return of a survey conducted by the spender to determine whether to endorse the candidate; or (9) the spender invites the candidate to appear before the spender's members, employees, or shareholders, including the candidate's participation in the event, unless the event promotes the election of the candidate or the defeat of the candidate's opponent, or the candidate requests or accepts campaign contributions at the event. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 211B.04, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Campaign material. (a) A person who participates in the preparation or dissemination of campaign material deleted text begin other than as provided in section 211B.05, subdivision 1,deleted text end that does not prominently include the name and address of the person or committee causing the material to be prepared or disseminated in a disclaimer substantially in the form provided in paragraph (b) or (c) is guilty of a misdemeanor. (b) Except in cases covered by paragraph (c), the required form of disclaimer is: "deleted text begin Prepared anddeleted text end Paid for by the ....... committee, ....... (address)" for material prepared and paid for by a principal campaign committee, or "deleted text begin Prepared anddeleted text end Paid for by the ....... committee, ....... (address)" for material prepared and paid for by a person or committee other than a principal campaign committee. The address must be either the committee's mailing address or the committee's website, if the website includes the committee's mailing address. If the material is produced and disseminated without cost, the words deleted text begin "paid for" may be omitted fromdeleted text end new text begin "Prepared by" may be used in place of "Paid for by" innew text end the disclaimer.new text begin Except as required by paragraph (c), in the case of a candidate's or committee's website or social media page, the requirements of this subdivision are satisfied for the entire website or social media page when the disclaimer appears once on the website or social media home page.new text end (c) In the case of deleted text begin broadcastdeleted text end new text begin audio or videonew text end media, new text begin including audio or video media posted on a candidate or principal campaign committee's website, new text end the required form of disclaimer is: "Paid for by the ....... committee." If the material is produced and broadcast without cost, the required form of the disclaimer is: "The ....... committee is responsible for the content of this message." Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 211B.04, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Independent expenditures. (a) deleted text begin The required form of the disclaimer on a writtendeleted text end new text begin Except in cases covered by paragraph (b), the required form of disclaimer for annew text end independent expenditure is: "This is an independent expenditure prepared and paid for by ....... (name of entity participating in the expenditure), ....... (address). It is not coordinated with or approved by any candidate nor is any candidate responsible for it." The address must be either the entity's mailing address or the entity's website, if the website includes the entity's mailing address. When a written independent expenditure is produced and disseminated without cost, the words "and paid for" may be omitted from the disclaimer. (b) The required form of the disclaimer on deleted text begin a broadcastdeleted text end new text begin an audio or video medianew text end independent expenditure is: "This independent expenditure is paid for by ....... (name of entity participating in the expenditure). It is not coordinated with or approved by any candidate nor is any candidate responsible for it." When deleted text begin a broadcastdeleted text end new text begin an audio or video medianew text end independent expenditure is produced and disseminated without cost, the following disclaimer may be used: "....... (name of entity participating in the expenditure) is responsible for the contents of this independent expenditure. It is not coordinated with or approved by any candidate nor is any candidate responsible for it." Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 211B.04, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Material that does not need a disclaimer. (a) This section does not apply to fundraising tickets, business cards, personal letters, or similar items that are clearly being distributed by the candidate. (b) This section does not apply to an individual or association that is not required to register or report under chapter 10A or 211A. (c) This section does not apply to the following: (1) bumper stickers, pins, buttons, pens, or similar small items on which the disclaimer cannot be conveniently printed; (2) skywriting, wearing apparel, or other means of displaying an advertisement of such a nature that the inclusion of a disclaimer would be impracticable; and (3) deleted text begin online banner ads and similardeleted text end electronic communications deleted text begin thatdeleted text end new text begin for which it would be technologically infeasible. In this case, the communication must state the name of the person who paid for, or in the case of a communication that is produced and disseminated without cost, who is responsible for the communication andnew text end link directly to an online page that includes new text begin only new text end the disclaimer. new text begin The person who paid for or is responsible for the communication must, at the request of the Campaign Finance and Public Disclosure Board or the Office of Administrative Hearings, demonstrate why it was technologically infeasible to include a disclaimer in the form required by subdivision 1 or 2.new text end deleted text begin (d) This section does not modify or repeal section 211B.06. deleted text end Sec. 5. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Rules, part 4503.2000, subpart 2, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Rule: 26-07017 4503.2000 DISCLAIMERS. § Subp. 2. Material linked to a disclaimer. Minnesota Statutes, section 211B.04, does not apply to the following communications that link directly to an online page that includes a disclaimer in the form required by that section if the communication is made by or on behalf of a candidate, principal campaign committee, political committee, political fund, political party unit, or person who has made an electioneering communication, as those terms are defined in Minnesota Statutes, chapter 10A: § A. text, images, video, or audio disseminated via a social media platform; § B. a text or multimedia message disseminated only to telephone numbers; § C. text, images, video, or audio disseminated using an application accessed primarily via mobile phone, excluding email messages, telephone calls, and voicemail messages; and § D. paid electronic advertisements disseminated via the internet by a third party, including but not limited to online banner advertisements and advertisements appearing within the electronic version of a newspaper, periodical, or magazine. The link must be conspicuous and when selected must result in the display of an online page that prominently includes the required disclaimer.